Mississippi, session 2026, SB2523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Section 37-101-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-101-15.  (a)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall succeed to and continue to exercise control of all records, books, papers, equipment, and supplies, and all lands, buildings, and other real and personal property belonging to or assigned to the use and benefit of the board of trustees formerly supervising and controlling the institutions of higher learning named in Section 37-101-1.  The board shall have and exercise control of the use, distribution and disbursement of all funds, appropriations and taxes, now and hereafter in possession, levied and collected, received, or appropriated for the use, benefit, support, and maintenance or capital outlay expenditures of the institutions of higher learning, including the authorization of employees to sign vouchers for the disbursement of funds for the various institutions, except where otherwise specifically provided by law. (b)  The board shall have general supervision of the affairs of all the institutions of higher learning, including the departments and the schools thereof.  The board shall have the power in its discretion to determine who shall be privileged to enter, to remain in, or to graduate therefrom.  The board shall have general supervision of the conduct of libraries and laboratories, the care of dormitories, buildings, and grounds; the business methods and arrangement of accounts and records; the organization of the administrative plan of each institution; and all other matters incident to the proper functioning of the institutions.  The board shall have the authority to establish minimum standards of achievement as a prerequisite for entrance into any of the institutions under its jurisdiction, which standards need not be uniform between the various institutions and which may be based upon such criteria as the board may establish. (c)  The board shall exercise all the powers and prerogatives conferred upon it under the laws establishing and providing for the operation of the several institutions herein specified.  The board shall adopt such bylaws and regulations from time to time as it deems expedient for the proper supervision and control of the several institutions of higher learning, insofar as such bylaws and regulations are not repugnant to the Constitution and laws, and not inconsistent with the object for which these institutions were established.  The board shall have power and authority to prescribe rules and regulations for policing the campuses and all buildings of the respective institutions, to authorize the arrest of all persons violating on any campus any criminal law of the state, and to have such law violators turned over to the civil authorities. (d)  For all institutions specified herein, the board shall provide a uniform system of recording and of accounting approved by the State Department of Audit.  The board shall annually prepare, or cause to be prepared, a budget for each institution of higher learning for the succeeding year which must be prepared and in readiness for at least thirty (30) days before the convening of the regular session of the Legislature.  All relationships and negotiations between the State Legislature and its various committees and the institutions named herein shall be carried on through the board of trustees.  No official, employee or agent representing any of the separate institutions shall appear before the Legislature or any committee thereof except upon the written order of the board or upon the request of the Legislature or a committee thereof. (e)  For all institutions specified herein, the board shall prepare an annual report to the Legislature setting forth the disbursements of all monies appropriated to the respective institutions.  Each report to the Legislature shall show how the money appropriated to the several institutions has been expended, beginning and ending with the fiscal years of the institutions, showing the name of each teacher, officer, and employee, and the salary paid each, and an itemized statement of each and every item of receipts and expenditures.  Each report must be balanced, and must begin with the former balance.  If any property belonging to the state or the institution is used for profit, the reports shall show the expense incurred in managing the property and the amount received therefrom.  The reports shall also show a summary of the gross receipts and gross disbursements for each year and shall show the money on hand at the beginning of the fiscal period of the institution next preceding each session of the Legislature and the necessary amount of expense to be incurred from said date to January 1 following.  The board shall keep the annual expenditures of each institution herein mentioned within the income derived from legislative appropriations and other sources, but in case of emergency arising from acts of providence, epidemics, fire or storm with the written approval of the Governor and by written consent of a majority of the senators and of the representatives it may exceed the income.  The board shall require a surety bond in a surety company authorized to do business in this state of every employee who is the custodian of funds belonging to one or more of the institutions mentioned herein, which bond shall be in a sum to be fixed by the board in an amount that will properly safeguard the said funds, the premium for which shall be paid out of the funds appropriated for said institutions. (f)  The board shall have the power and authority to elect the heads of the various institutions of higher learning and to contract with all deans, professors, and other members of the teaching staff, and all administrative employees of said institutions for a term not exceeding four (4) years.  The board shall have the power and authority to terminate any such contract at any time for malfeasance, inefficiency, or contumacious conduct, but never for political reasons.  It shall be the policy of the board to permit the executive head of each institution to nominate for election by the board all subordinate employees of the institution over which he presides.  It shall be the policy of the board to elect all officials for a definite tenure of service and to reelect during the period of satisfactory service.  The board shall have the power to make any adjustments it thinks necessary between the various departments and schools of any institution or between the different institutions. (g)  The board shall keep complete minutes and records of all proceedings which shall be open for inspection by any citizen of the state. (h)  The board shall have the power to enter into an energy performance contract, energy services contract, on a shared-savings, lease or lease-purchase basis, for energy efficiency services and/or equipment as prescribed in Section 31-7-14. (i)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, for and on behalf of Jackson State University, is hereby authorized to convey by donation or otherwise easements across portions of certain real estate located in the City of Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi, for right-of-way required for the Metro Parkway Project. (j)  In connection with any international contract between the board or one (1) of the state's institutions of higher learning and any party outside of the United States, the board or institution that is the party to the international contract is hereby authorized and empowered to include in the contract a provision for the resolution by arbitration of any controversy between the parties to the contract relating to such contract or the failure or refusal to perform any part of the contract. Such provision shall be valid, enforceable and irrevocable without regard to the justiciable character of the controversy.  Provided, however, that in the event either party to such contract initiates litigation against the other with respect to the contract, the arbitration provision shall be deemed waived unless asserted as a defense on or before the responding party is required to answer such litigation. (k)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning ("board"), on behalf of any institution under its jurisdiction, shall purchase and maintain business property insurance and business personal property insurance on all university-owned buildings and/or contents as required by federal law and regulations of the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) as is necessary for receiving public assistance or reimbursement for repair, reconstruction, replacement or other damage to those buildings and/or contents caused by the Hurricane Katrina Disaster of 2005 or subsequent disasters.  The board is authorized to expend funds from any available source for the purpose of obtaining and maintaining that property insurance.  The board is authorized to enter into agreements with the Department of Finance and Administration, local school districts, community/junior college districts, community hospitals and/or other state agencies to pool their liabilities to participate in a group business property and/or business personal property insurance program, subject to uniform rules and regulations as may be adopted by the Department of Finance and Administration. (l)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or its designee, may approve the payment or reimbursement of reasonable travel expenses incurred by candidates for open positions at the board's executive office or at any of the state institutions of higher learning, when the job candidate has incurred expenses in traveling to a job interview at the request of the board, the Commissioner of Higher Education or a state institution of higher learning administrator. (m)  (i)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning is authorized to administer and approve contracts for the construction and maintenance of buildings and other facilities of the state institutions of higher learning, including related contracts for architectural and engineering services, which are paid for with self-generated funds. (ii)  Additionally, the board is authorized to oversee, administer and approve contracts for the construction and maintenance of buildings and other facilities of the state institutions of higher learning, including related contracts for architectural and engineering services, which are funded in whole or in part by general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi at institutions designated annually by the board as being capable to procure and administer all such contracts.  Prior to the disbursement of funds, an agreement for each project between the institution and the Department of Finance and Administration shall be executed.  The approval and execution of the agreement shall not be withheld by either party unless the withholding party provides a written, detailed explanation of the basis for withholding to the other party.  The agreement shall stipulate the responsibilities of each party, applicable procurement regulations, documentation and reporting requirements, conditions prior to, and schedule of, disbursement of general obligation bond funds to the institution and provisions concerning handling any remaining general obligation bonds at the completion of the project.  Such agreement shall not include provisions that constitute additional qualifications or criteria that act to invalidate the designation of an institution as capable of procuring and administering such project.  Inclusion of any such provisions may be appealed to the Public Procurement Review Board. (n)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning ("board") shall require all on-campus faculty and staff employed by, and all students attending, any of the state institutions of higher learning identified in Section 37-101-1 to be issued an identification badge in physical or electronic format.  Any identification card issued or renewed pursuant to this section, whether physical or in an electronic format, shall include the words "Crisis Lifeline - Dial or Text 988, or chat 988lifeline.org" or like language for formatting purposes. (o)  (i)  It is the intent of the Legislature that a significant portion of general operating funds for state institutions of higher learning be distributed through a uniform, data-driven funding model that rewards demonstrated outcomes, encourages continuous improvement and ensures responsible stewardship of public funds. (ii)  1.  Beginning July 1, 2029, not less than seventy-five percent (75%) of all state general funds appropriated for the general operating expenses of state institutions of higher learning shall be distributed through a performance funding model adopted by the board pursuant to this subsection (o). 2.  No more than twenty-five percent (25%) of general appropriations to the board may be distributed according to a method other than the developed funding formula. 3.  Funds appropriated by the Legislature as separate line-item allocations, special project appropriations, capital outlay funds, debt service or other specifically designated purposes shall not be subject to the limitations of this subsection (o), shall not be included in the calculation of the seventy-five percent (75%) requirement and shall not be reduced, offset, withheld or otherwise affected based upon an institution's performance under this model. (iii)  Of the seventy-five percent (75%) of funds distributed through the funding model, not more than ten percent (10%) of total general operating funds shall be subject to a performance-based holdout, which shall be distributed, restored or withheld based on institutional performance in accordance with this subsection (o). (iv)  The funding model adopted by the board shall, at a minimum, include the following elements: 1.  A base appropriation to ensure institutional stability; and 2.  A performance-based allocation tied to measurable outcomes.  Performance measures shall not rely solely on enrollment counts or attempted credit hours.  Metric weights may vary by institutional mission or classification; however, no institution shall be exempt from evaluation across all required metric categories as described in paragraph (v) of this subsection (o). (v)  Such measurable outcomes shall include, at a minimum, the following nationally recognized performance measures and definitions, which shall be calculated using standardized definitions adopted by rule: 1.  Student attainment and degree completion, including: a. Completion of a baccalaureate degree within four (4) academic years by first-time, full-time degree-seeking students; b. Completion of a baccalaureate degree within six (6) academic years by first-time, full-time degree-seeking students; c. Community college transfer outcomes, which shall include both: A. Transfer success, measured by students who transfer from a Mississippi community or junior college into a public university and who subsequently complete a minimum of thirty (30) university-level credit hours or persist into a second academic year at the receiving institution; B. Transfer completion, measured by the completion of a baccalaureate degree by such transfer students within a time frame established by the board, not to exceed six (6) academic years from the student's initial postsecondary enrollment.  No institution shall receive performance credit solely for the enrollment of transfer students absent demonstrated persistence or completion outcomes; and d. Completion of a baccalaureate degree within six (6) years by students receiving a Pell Grant or a HELP Grant; 2.  Student progression and persistence toward completion; 3. Postsecondary employment or continuing education outcomes; 4.  Persistence and completion of low-income and underrepresented students; 5.  Efficiency and time-to-degree; and 6.  Degree or credential production in fields of statewide workforce need. (vi)  All calculations done according to paragraph (v) shall use a rolling three-year average in order to reduce year-to-year volatility and reward sustained improvement. (vii)  1.  On or before June 20, 2026, the board shall establish performance standards, scoring thresholds and values for each metric in a publicly noticed meeting.  Such standards, thresholds and values: a.  Shall be adopted before the measurement period begins; and b.  Shall not be modified for any specific period after institutional performance data has been received for that period.  Standards, thresholds and values shall only be modified in advance of the subsequent collection period. 2.  An institution shall meet the minimum performance standards established by the board in order to restore all or a portion of its ten percent (10%) performance-based holdout. (viii)  1.  In developing, calculating or administering the funding model: a.  No revenues, expenditures or financial transfers related to intercollegiate athletics shall be included, imputed, netted or otherwise considered; and b.  No funds held by or distributed through an institutional foundation, alumni association, booster organization or affiliated nonprofit entity shall be included, imputed, netted or otherwise considered. 2.  The funding model shall rely exclusively on academic and educational revenues and expenditures derived from state appropriations, tuition and fees, and other institutionally controlled educational funds, as defined by rule. (ix)  1.  The board shall continuously monitor institutional performance under the funding model, including trend data derived from rolling multiyear averages. 2.  Annually, the board shall identify any institution that is reasonably projected to fail to meet one or more minimum performance standards in the upcoming fiscal year. Any institution that is reasonably projected to fail to meet one or more such standards shall be considered at-risk. 3.  Upon identification, the board shall provide written notice to the institution specifying the at-risk performance standards and shall offer technical assistance and data analysis to support corrective action. 4.  If an institution remains at-risk in any metric, the board shall require submission of a targeted improvement plan.  Such improvement plan shall identify deficient performance categories, specify corrective strategies and timelines and include measurable targets for improvement. 5.  An institution shall only be subject to withholding of funds under the performance-based holdout if the board has complied with the requirements of this subsection, except in cases of material data misreporting or noncompliance with board rules. (x)  The board shall submit an annual report to the Legislature.  Within five (5) business days of submission to the Legislature, such report shall be published on the board's public website.  The report shall include: 1.  A description of the funding model and methodology; 2.  Institution-level performance results, including four-year graduation rates, six-year graduation rates, six-year Pell Grant graduation rates, HELP Grant graduation rates, and community college transfer completion outcomes; 3.  Three-year performance trends used in calculating rolling averages; 4. Identification of institutions meeting thresholds or identified as at-risk; 5.  Board actions taken under paragraph (ix) of this subsection (o); 6. Distribution, restoration or withholding of performance-based funds; 7.  Access impacts; and 8.  Board certification of compliance with this subsection (o). (xi)  The board shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this subsection, including standardized metric definitions, data sources, validation procedures and appeals processes, provided that such rules remain within the parameters established herein. (xii)  The board shall adopt and publish the funding model, including all metric definitions, benchmarks and weights, not later than June 30, 2026.  For the initial three (3) fiscal years following passage of this act, the funding model shall apply only to new state general funds appropriated for the general operating expenses of state institutions of higher learning and shall not be applied to reallocate existing state funds. (xiii)  Beginning July 1, 2029, the funding model shall be fully implemented, and all state general funds appropriated for general operating expenses shall be distributed in accordance with the model using the three-year rolling averages required in this subsection (o). (p)  The board shall not permit a person subject to the registration requirements under Sections 45-33-21 through 45-33-63 to reside in a dormitory or other student living accommodation located on the campus of or managed by a state institution of higher learning. SECTION 2. Section 37-101-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-1.  The following state institutions of higher learning shall be under the management and control of a board of trustees to be known as the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, namely: (a)  The University of Mississippi; (b)  Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science; (c)  Mississippi University for Women; (d)  The University of Southern Mississippi; (e)  Delta State University; (f)  Alcorn State University; (g)  Jackson State University; (h)  Mississippi Valley State University; (i)  And any other of like kind which may be hereafter established by the state. SECTION 3. Section 37-101-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-2.  There is hereby established within the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning a Welfare Policy Institute at a campus location to be designated by the board of trustees.  The purpose of the institute shall be to research and gather empirical information regarding the social and welfare programs authorized under Sections 43-49-1 through 43-49-15, 43-13-115, 43-17-1, 43-17-5, 43-1-8, 43-1-10, 43-1-30 and 37-101-2 and to write grant proposals regarding the policy implications of such program. SECTION 4. Section 37-101-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-3.  (1)  The Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint the members of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, one (1) member from each congressional district of the state as existing as of March 31, 1944, one (1) member from each Supreme Court district and two (2) members from the state at large, with the terms of each to begin on May 8, 1944.  One-third (1/3) of the membership of said board so appointed shall be appointed for a period of four (4) years, one-third (1/3) for a period of eight (8) years and one-third (1/3) for a period of twelve (12) years.  On the expiration of any of said terms of office the Governor shall appoint successors, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, for terms of twelve (12) years in each case. The current president, or his/her designee, of the Student Body President's Council of Mississippi (SBPCM) shall have a reserved seat at each meeting of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning.  No less than once a year, the board shall seek the advise and counsel of the student body president's organization. (2)  In case of a vacancy on said board by death or resignation of a member or from any other cause than the expiration of such member's term of office, the board shall elect his successor who shall hold office until the end of the next session of the Legislature. During such term of the session of the Legislature, the Governor shall appoint the successor member of the board from the district from which his predecessor was appointed to hold office until the end of the period or term for which said original trustee was appointed, to the end that one-third (1/3) of such trustees' terms shall expire each four (4) years. (3)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Community College Board, or his designee, and one (1) member of the Mississippi Community College Board, to be designated by the chairman of said board, shall attend all regular meetings of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning.  Said community/junior college representatives shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the board.  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Community College Board and any designee who is a state employee shall receive no per diem for attending meetings of the board, but shall be entitled to actual and necessary expense reimbursement and mileage for attending meetings at locations other than Jackson, Mississippi.  The designee of the Mississippi Community College Board shall receive per diem compensation as authorized by Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, for attending said meetings, and shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual expense reimbursement and mileage, which shall be paid from funds appropriated to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. SECTION 5. Section 37-101-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-4.  There shall be a trusteeship, to be known as the Felix La Bauve Scholarship Trust, for the Felix La Bauve Scholarship that exists for the benefit of the University of Mississippi.  The trusteeship shall be composed of three (3) persons.  The initial composition of the trusteeship shall be the two (2) persons who last filled the position of La Bauve trustee on the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and, as an ex officio voting member, the person holding the office of DeSoto County Superintendent of Education.  The term of the trustee who served as La Bauve trustee on the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning from 1980-1984 shall be four (4) years.  The term of the trustee who served in that position from 1984-1988 shall be eight (8) years.  The term of each of the trustees shall begin on June 1, 1988. At least one (1) month before the expiration of the term of a trustee, other than the DeSoto County Superintendent of Education, the trusteeship shall choose a successor who shall serve a term of eight (8) years.  No trustee other than the DeSoto County Superintendent of Education shall serve more than one (1) term of office.  Any person chosen as a trustee other than the Superintendent of Education shall be a resident of DeSoto County and shall hold an undergraduate degree from the University of Mississippi. In case of the death, disability or resignation of any trustee, other than the DeSoto County Superintendent of Education, the trusteeship shall appoint a person to serve the remainder of the term of his predecessor who shall be a resident of DeSoto County and shall hold an undergraduate degree from the University of Mississippi. The trusteeship shall be responsible for recommending to the Chancellor of the University of Mississippi prospective students who are eligible recipients of the La Bauve Scholarship. The chancellor shall choose the best qualified student or students from those nominated, depending on the amount of monies available for scholarship awards. The Legislature shall continue to appropriate the annual sum to the University of Mississippi that has been paid in lieu of the interest earned on the original corpus of the La Bauve Scholarship Fund until such time as the Legislature restores the original corpus of the fund, adjusted to current value at the time of restoration.  Once the Legislature has restored the fund as hereinbefore provided, the annual appropriation shall cease, and scholarships shall be awarded from the income on the corpus of the fund.  Thereafter, no expenditure shall be made from the corpus of the fund for any purpose. SECTION 6. Section 37-101-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-5.  There shall be appointed only men or women to membership on the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning as shall be qualified electors residing in the district from which each is appointed and at least twenty-five (25) years of age and of the highest order of intelligence, character, learning and fitness for the performance of such duties to the end that such board shall perform the high and honorable duties thereof to the greatest advantage of the people of the state and of such institutions, uninfluenced by any political considerations. SECTION 7. Section 37-101-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-7.  Within ten (10) days after the beginning of the terms of office of its members, upon call of the Governor, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall meet in the City of Jackson and organize by electing one (1) of its number as president, whose term of office shall be for one (1) year or until a successor shall be elected, and shall transact such other business as may come before the meeting.  When the presiding officer has voted and the result is a tie, he cannot vote again to break the tie. The trustees shall have authority to appoint a nonmember as Commissioner of Higher Education, who shall possess the highest qualifications as an administrator and research worker. The Commissioner of Higher Education shall maintain an office and be responsible to the board for the efficient functioning of the staff which the board may from time to time establish.  It shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Higher Education to make constant inquiry into the problems of higher education, to survey and study carefully the organization, management and all other affairs of each institution under the control of said trustees, to make report of all findings and recommend such changes as will increase efficiency and economy in the operation of each institution, and to perform such other duties as the board may prescribe.  The Commissioner of Higher Education shall be responsible for compiling all laws and all rules and regulations of a general nature adopted by the board for the governance of the various institutions of higher learning in pamphlet or loose-leaf form. Current copies of such compilations shall be furnished to all officials directly responsible for the carrying out of such laws, rules and regulations. The expenses for such compilation and publication shall be paid by the board out of any funds available for the operation of said board. The trustees shall authorize the employment of such other personnel as may be required from time to time to carry out the functions of the board and may assign to the personnel so employed such functions and duties and may delegate to the commissioner or other personnel such powers of the board as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the board was established.  All such personnel shall be employed by the commissioner with the approval of the board and shall hold office at the pleasure of the commissioner.  The board shall also have the authority to employ on a fee basis such technical and professional assistance as may be necessary to carry out the powers, duties and purposes of the board. The Commissioner of Higher Education and other personnel employed by the board shall receive reasonable salaries commensurate with their duties and functions, the amount of which shall be fixed by the board.  The reasonable traveling expenses and other authorized expenses incurred by the commissioner and other personnel in the performance of their duties, together with other expenses of the operation of the executive office, shall be prorated and deducted from the appropriations for the current expenses of the several institutions. SECTION 8. Section 37-101-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-9.  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall serve without salary compensation but shall receive a per diem and mileage as authorized by law including time of going to and returning from meetings of said board, together with actual travel and hotel expenses incident to the meetings of the board, and in the discharge of duties prescribed by the board. The board of trustees shall hold two (2) regular slated meetings annually, one (1) in June and the other in January, and as many special meetings as may be necessary on call of the president or on call of five (5) members.  In either case, the call shall be in writing and shall be mailed by registered letter with return receipt requested, or by certified mail, to each and every member at least five (5) days prior to the date of meeting. Eight (8) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. SECTION 9. Section 37-101-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-11.  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to adopt and have an official seal in such form as it deems appropriate for its official use. SECTION 10. Section 37-101-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-13.  It shall be the duty of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and the boards of trustees of the community colleges to begin immediately a comprehensive study of gaming and related programs, degrees and courses offered.  Following the completion of such study, the board shall make such adjustments as may be found to be necessary in the programs of the various institutions, to the end that the broadest possible educational opportunities shall be offered to the citizens of this state without inefficient and needless duplication.  Subject to the provisions of Section 75-76-34, the board shall, through such officers of the board and through such procedures as it shall see fit to establish, exercise continuing jurisdiction and control over the establishment of new courses of study, new departments and new functions and activities in each institution so that the growth and development of the program of higher education in the state shall proceed in an orderly and rational manner, inefficient and needless duplication may be avoided, and new expanded programs will be undertaken only as the same may become justified, based upon objective criteria to be established by the board.  In carrying out the purposes of this section, particular attention shall be given to the extension programs of the various institutions.  The boards, in conjunction with the chancellor and presidents of the institutions, shall take such steps as may be necessary to improve and coordinate such programs and shall exercise such direct control over the establishment, organization, operation and granting of credit for such programs as may be necessary to accomplish such purposes. SECTION 11. Section 37-101-16, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-16.  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall develop a system of manpower management which shall be implemented in all institutions under the control of the board.  The manpower management system shall be so designed to insure accurate and rapid reporting of all manpower positions within each institution by job classification to include position number and title, grade, salary and fringe benefits, name of incumbent, social security number and date of hire. SECTION 12. Section 37-101-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-19.  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning is hereby authorized and empowered to establish and maintain a marine research laboratory on lands belonging to the State of Mississippi, said lands being a part of the Magnolia State Park in Jackson County, Mississippi, and to be assigned for the use of such laboratory by the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources. The marine research laboratory may, in the discretion of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, be operated by the Mississippi Academy of Science, Inc., under the supervision and control of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning is hereby authorized and empowered to expend annually out of its regular appropriation for the support and maintenance of institutions of higher learning a sum not exceeding Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for the support and maintenance of the marine research laboratory. SECTION 13. Section 37-101-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-21.  A body politic and corporate is hereby created under the name of Gulf Coast Research Laboratory, to have perpetual succession, with powers to contract and be contracted with; to receive and acquire, by any legal method, property of any description, necessary or convenient for its operation, and to hold, employ, use and convey the same; to adopt and use a corporate seal; and to adopt bylaws, rules and regulations for the government of the same, its employees, officials, agents, and members. The object and purposes of the Gulf Coast Research Laboratory shall be to promote the study and knowledge of science including the natural resources of the State of Mississippi and to provide for the dissemination of research findings and specimens from the Gulf Coast area. The Gulf Coast Research Laboratory shall be under the control and supervision of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, and the powers of said laboratory shall be vested in and its duties performed by said board. The laboratory shall be located at some appropriate place within the state and on the Gulf of Mexico to be determined by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. It shall be the duty of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning to appoint or elect a director for said laboratory, determine the number of instructors, assistants and other employees and fix their compensation, and in cooperation with the Mississippi Academy of Science, prescribe rules, regulations, and policies governing the operation of the institution, qualifications of instructors and employees and for the admission of students, and for the direction of research programs. SECTION 14. Section 37-101-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-23.  (1)  The Mississippi Small Farm Development Center, which shall be referred to in this section as the SFDC, is established under the management and control of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning.  The principal offices of the SFDC shall be located at Alcorn State University and shall be under the direction of the president of the university subject to the governance of the board of trustees.  The president shall appoint a director of the SFDC who shall recommend to the president necessary professional and administrative staff of the center, all subject to the approval of the board of trustees. (2)  It shall be the function and duty of the SFDC to: (a)  Develop a system to deliver management and technical assistance to small farms utilizing the resources of local, state and federal government programs, various segments of the private sector, and universities and colleges throughout the state; (b)  Make management and technical assistance available to small farms by linking together with the above resources; (c)  Research and develop small farm opportunities for new or alternative crops; (d)  Develop a clearinghouse for the collection and dissemination of agricultural and economic data; and (e)  Assist small farms in developing more efficient marketing and distribution channels, including foreign trade marketing. SECTION 15. Section 37-101-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-25.  The Mississippi Small Farm Development Center shall develop a plan to foster and encourage the development in this state of small enterprises which process "cash crops," timber, or food and fiber products produced in Mississippi.  The plan shall include, but not be limited to: (a)  Means to identify small entrepreneurs who are in the business of processing, or are interested in starting a business to process, "cash crops," timber, or food and fiber products; (b)  Means to encourage participation by such small entrepreneurs in available business management and technical assistance programs; and (c)  Any appropriate financial assistance to assist such small entrepreneurs in financing their business, such as interest-free state loans similar to existing Department of Economic and Community Development programs administered out of the Emerging Crops Fund. SECTION 16. Section 37-101-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-29.  Each institution of higher learning with a teacher education program approved by the State Board of Education shall prepare and submit to the State Board of Education and to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning an annual performance report on the institution's teacher education program.  The report shall include the following information: (a)  Teacher enrollment data; (b)  Professional education faculty data; (c)  Characteristics of students receiving initial licensure; (d)  Number and percentage of program completers scoring at or above the proficiency level on the prescribed teacher education exit tests; (e)  Satisfaction rate of employers and graduates; (f)  Follow-up profiles of graduates of the teacher education program; and (g)  Any other information required by the State Board of Education.  Before requiring any other information, the State Board of Education shall conduct collaborative planning activities with the Mississippi Association of Colleges of Teacher Education and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. The State Department of Education, in collaboration with the Mississippi Association of Colleges of Teacher Education and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, shall prepare a common form for the preparation and submission of the annual performance reports.  The State Department of Education shall establish the date by which such reports must be submitted to the board.  No later than sixty (60) days after the deadline date established for the submission of reports, the department shall submit a compilation of all annual performance reports received from the state institutions of higher learning to the Chairmen of the Education Committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate. SECTION 17. Section 37-101-30, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-30.  (1)  The Legislature finds and declares that a compelling state interest exists in providing a retirement incentive program or encouraging the retirement of those employees of institutions of higher learning who are current and active contributing members of the Public Employees' Retirement System. (2)  As used in this section: (a)  "Board" means the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. (b) "Program" means the retirement incentive program established under this section. (3)  (a)  The board is authorized to pay, in fiscal years selected by the board, a monetary incentive to employees who are eligible for retirement in exchange for a voluntary agreement of the employee: (i)  To retire on a specific date as set forth in subsection (6) of this section, and (ii)  To waive any and all claims, known or unknown, arising out of or related to employment or cessation of employment at institutions of higher learning. (b)  The granting of additional compensation shall be made in exchange for additional consideration given by the employee. (c)  The retirement incentive authorized by this section is a voluntary plan for institutions of higher learning faculty and staff offering an incentive for retirement.  The plan shall be available to all full-time faculty and staff who meet the eligibility criteria set forth in subsection (4) of this section. (4)  (a)  To be eligible to participate in the program, full-time faculty and staff of institutions of higher learning must, as of the effective date of their retirement, be eligible to retire under the laws governing the Public Employees' Retirement System by virtue of: (i)  Having twenty-five (25) years of creditable service, or (ii)  Being age sixty (60) and having at least four (4) years of creditable service. (b)  The institution of higher learning offering the program shall, in all cases, utilize the records of the Public Employees' Retirement System as the source for determining eligibility. (c)  The program is offered as an alternative to any other retirement incentive plan that may be offered by the state or the Public Employees' Retirement System in the future. (5)  In accordance with applicable law, the institution of higher learning shall provide a cash benefit to each participant in the program based upon a percentage of the participant's current salary that is subject to federal income tax, state income tax and Federal Insurance Contributions Act withholding.  The participant shall be compensated for unused annual leave as otherwise provided by law.  The cash benefit paid under this section shall not be subject to employer or employee contributions under the laws governing the Public Employees' Retirement System. (6)  Eligible employees shall make their election to participate in the program in the manner and at the time prescribed by the board.  The date of retirement for all employees participating in this program shall be June 30 of any fiscal year in which the program is offered.  Employees electing to participate in the program shall agree to waive any claims, known or unknown, arising out of or related to employment or cessation of employment at institutions of higher learning.  An employee may revoke the election to participate in the program within seven (7) days after the execution of the election. (7)  The additional compensation authorized under the program is made in exchange for additional consideration given by the employee. (8)  The board shall prescribe such rules and regulations as it shall consider necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. SECTION 18. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.